hunspell/spanish.aff
SFX V		 ar		 aran		otear
SFX V		 ar		 arán		otear
SFX V		 ar		 aran		otipar
SFX V		 ar		 arán		otizar
SFX V		 ar		 aran		ovar
SFX V		 ar		 aran		oxidar
SFX V		 ar		 aran		oyar
SFX V		 ar		 arán		oyar
SFX V		 ar		 aran		ozar
SFX V		 ar		 arán		ozar
SFX V		 ar		 arán		pacar
SFX V		 ar		 arán		palear
SFX V		 ar		 aran		palmar
SFX V		 ar		 aran		pañar
SFX V		 ar		 aran		papar
SFX V		 ar		 aran		par
SFX V		 ar		 arán		par
SFX V		 ar		 arán		parar
SFX V		 ar		 arán		parejar
SFX V		 ar		 aran		parvar
SFX V		 ar		 arán		pasar
SFX V		 ar		 aran		paular
SFX V		 ar		 aran		pear
SFX V		 ar		 arán		pear
SFX V		 ar		 aran		pegar
SFX V		 ar		 arán		pegar
SFX V		 ar		 aran		pelar
SFX V		 ar		 aran		pelear
SFX V		 ar		 aran		pellar
SFX V		 ar		 arán		pellar
SFX V		 ar		 aran		penar
SFX V		 ar		 arán		penar
SFX V		 ar		 arán		peñar
SFX V		 ar		 aran		pensar
SFX V		 ar		 aran		perar
SFX V		 ar		 aran		perchar
SFX V		 ar		 arán		pernar
SFX V		 ar		 aran		petar
SFX V		 ar		 arán		petar
SFX V		 ar		 aran		piar
SFX V		 ar		 arán		piar
SFX V		 ar		 aran		picar
SFX V		 ar		 aran		piciar
SFX V		 ar		 aran		pidar
SFX V		 ar		 arán		pillar
SFX V		 ar		 aran		pimpollar
SFX V		 ar		 arán		pitar
SFX V		 ar		 arán		planar
SFX V		 ar		 aran		plantar
SFX V		 ar		 arán		plantar
SFX V		 ar		 aran		plar
SFX V		 ar		 arán		plazar
SFX V		 ar		 aran		plicar
SFX V		 ar		 arán		plomar
SFX V		 ar		 aran		podar
SFX V		 ar		 arán		polar
SFX V		 ar		 arán		pollar
SFX V		 ar		 aran		porizar
SFX V		 ar		 aran		portar
SFX V		 ar		 aran		posar
SFX V		 ar		 aran		postar
SFX V		 ar		 aran		preciar
SFX V		 ar		 arán		preciar
SFX V		 ar		 arán		precintar
SFX V		 ar		 arán		prensar
SFX V		 ar		 arán		preocupar
SFX V		 ar		 arán		pretar
SFX V		 ar		 arán		probar
SFX V		 ar		 arán		ptar
SFX V		 ar		 aran		pujar
SFX V		 ar		 aran		puntar
SFX V		 ar		 aran		purar
SFX V		 ar		 aran		purrear
SFX V		 ar		 aran		putar
SFX V		 ar		 ar		anquear
SFX V		 ar		 aran		quear
SFX V		 ar		 arán		quetear
SFX V		 ar		 aran		quiar
SFX V		 ar		 arán		quiar
SFX V		 ar		 aran		quilar
SFX V		 ar		 arán		quillar
SFX V		 ar		 aran		quinar
SFX V		 ar		 arán		quistar
SFX V		 ar		 arán		rabear
SFX V		 ar		 arán		racar
SFX V		 ar		 aran		ractar
SFX V		 ar		 arán		radicar
SFX V		 ar		 arán		rajar
SFX V		 ar		 arán		ralizar
SFX V		 ar		 aran		ramar
SFX V		 ar		 arán		ramar
SFX V		 ar		 aran		rañar
SFX V		 ar		 aran		ranzar
SFX V		 ar		 aran		rar
SFX V		 ar		 arán		rar
SFX V		 ar		 arán		rasar
SFX V		 ar		 aran		rascar
SFX V		 ar		 arán		rasear
SFX V		 ar		 arán		ratar
SFX V		 ar		 aran		ravar
SFX V		 ar		 arán		razar
SFX V		 ar		 aran		rbar
SFX V		 ar		 arán		rbar
SFX V		 ar		 arán		rbotar
SFX V		 ar		 aran		rbotear
SFX V		 ar		 aran		rcar
SFX V		 ar		 arán		rcar
SFX V		 ar		 aran		rchar
SFX V		 ar		 arán		rchar
SFX V		 ar		 aran		rchear
SFX V		 ar		 arán		rciar
SFX V		 ar		 aran		rdear
SFX V		 ar		 arán		rdear
SFX V		 ar		 aran		rdelar
SFX V		 ar		 aran		rdinar
SFX V		 ar		 aran		rear
SFX V		 ar		 arán		rear
SFX V		 ar		 arán		rebañar
SFX V		 ar		 aran		redar
SFX V		 ar		 aran		regar
SFX V		 ar		 arán		regar
SFX V		 ar		 aran		relacionar
SFX V		 ar		 arán		relar
SFX V		 ar		 aran		remangar
SFX V		 ar		 aran		remar
SFX V		 ar		 aran		renar
SFX V		 ar		 arán		renar
SFX V		 ar		 aran		reñar
SFX V		 ar		 arán		rentar
SFX V		 ar		 aran		repelar
SFX V		 ar		 aran		resar
SFX V		 ar		 aran		rescar
SFX V		 ar		 arán		resembrar
SFX V		 ar		 aran		restar
SFX V		 ar		 arán		restar
SFX V		 ar		 arán		retar
SFX V		 ar		 aran		rezar
SFX V		 ar		 aran		riar
SFX V		 ar		 arán		riar
SFX V		 ar		 aran		ricar
SFX V		 ar		 arán		ricar
SFX V		 ar		 arán		ridar
SFX V		 ar		 arán		rielar
SFX V		 ar		 aran		rifar
SFX V		 ar		 arán		rificar
SFX V		 ar		 aran		rilar
SFX V		 ar		 arán		rillar
SFX V		 ar		 aran		rimar
SFX V		 ar		 aran		rinar
SFX V		 ar		 aran		ringar
SFX V		 ar		 arán		riorizar
SFX V		 ar		 aran		riquear
SFX V		 ar		 arán		riscar
SFX V		 ar		 aran		ritar
SFX V		 ar		 aran		riturar
SFX V		 ar		 aran		rizar
SFX V		 ar		 aran		rmar
SFX V		 ar		 aran		rmentar
SFX V		 ar		 aran		rnar
SFX V		 ar		 arán		rnar
SFX V		 ar		 arán		rnear
SFX V		 ar		 aran		rnizar
SFX V		 ar		 arán		roar
SFX V		 ar		 aran		robar
SFX V		 ar		 arán		roborar
SFX V		 ar		 aran		rochar
SFX V		 ar		 aran		rogar
SFX V		 ar		 arán		rogar
SFX V		 ar		 arán		rojar
SFX V		 ar		 arán		rolear
SFX V		 ar		 aran		romar
SFX V		 ar		 aran		ronar
SFX V		 ar		 aran		roñar
SFX V		 ar		 aran		roncar
SFX V		 ar		 aran		ronear
SFX V		 ar		 arán		ronear
SFX V		 ar		 aran		rotar
SFX V		 ar		 aran		rrajar
SFX V		 ar		 arán		rrar
SFX V		 ar		 aran		rrear
SFX V		 ar		 arán		rrear
SFX V		 ar		 arán		rrinar
SFX V		 ar		 aran		rrizar
SFX V		 ar		 aran		rufar
SFX V		 ar		 aran		rugar
SFX V		 ar		 aran		rullar
SFX V		 ar		 arán		rumar
SFX V		 ar		 arán		rutar
SFX V		 ar		 arán		rvar
SFX V		 ar		 aran		rzar
SFX V		 ar		 ará		nsacar
SFX V		 ar		 arán		samar
SFX V		 ar		 arán		sanar
SFX V		 ar		 aran		sanear
SFX V		 ar		 ar		ansar
SFX V		 ar		 aran		sar
SFX V		 ar		 arán		sar
SFX V		 ar		 aran		scar
SFX V		 ar		 arán		scarar
SFX V		 ar		 aran		scordar
SFX V		 ar		 aran		sear
SFX V		 ar		 arán		sear
SFX V		 ar		 aran		secar
SFX V		 ar		 arán		secar
SFX V		 ar		 aran		sentar
SFX V		 ar		 aran		sgar
SFX V		 ar		 arán		sificar
SFX V		 ar		 aran		sillar
SFX V		 ar		 aran		sionar
SFX V		 ar		 arán		sionar
SFX V		 ar		 arán		smontar
SFX V		 ar		 aran		solar
SFX V		 ar		 aran		soldar
SFX V		 ar		 aran		solidar
SFX V		 ar		 arán		sonar
SFX V		 ar		 arán		soñar
SFX V		 ar		 aran		spar
SFX V		 ar		 arán		squear
SFX V		 ar		 arán		squillar
SFX V		 ar		 arán		stanciar
SFX V		 ar		 aran		star
SFX V		 ar		 arán		star
SFX V		 ar		 arán		statar
SFX V		 ar		 aran		stear
SFX V		 ar		 arán		stear
SFX V		 ar		 aran		stiar
SFX V		 ar		 aran		stificar
SFX V		 ar		 aran		stilar
SFX V		 ar		 aran		stinar
SFX V		 ar		 aran		strar
SFX V		 ar		 arán		strar
SFX V		 ar		 arán		surar
SFX V		 ar		 aran		tablar
SFX V		 ar		 arán		tacar
SFX V		 ar		 aran		tajar
SFX V		 ar		 arán		tajar
SFX V		 ar		 aran		talizar
SFX V		 ar		 arán		talizar
SFX V		 ar		 aran		tallar
SFX V		 ar		 arán		tallar
SFX V		 ar		 aran		tañar
SFX V		 ar		 aran		tanear
SFX V		 ar		 arán		tanear
SFX V		 ar		 ar		antar
SFX V		 ar		 ara		ntar
SFX V		 ar		 aran		tar
SFX V		 ar		 arán		tar
SFX V		 ar		 aran		tatar
SFX V		 ar		 ara		ntear
SFX V		 ar		 aran		tear
SFX V		 ar		 arán		tear
SFX V		 ar		 aran		techar
SFX V		 ar		 arán		tejar
SFX V		 ar		 aran		telar
SFX V		 ar		 aran		temperar
SFX V		 ar		 arán		tenciar
SFX V		 ar		 arán		terar
SFX V		 ar		 aran		terrar
SFX V		 ar		 aran		tesar
SFX V		 ar		 arán		tesar
SFX V		 ar		 aran		tezar
SFX V		 ar		 aran		tiar
SFX V		 ar		 aran		tificar
SFX V		 ar		 arán		tificar
SFX V		 ar		 ar		antiguar
SFX V		 ar		 aran		tilizar
SFX V		 ar		 arán		tilizar
SFX V		 ar		 ar		antillar
SFX V		 ar		 aran		tillar
SFX V		 ar		 aran		tillear
SFX V		 ar		 aran		timar
SFX V		 ar		 arán		timar
SFX V		 ar		 aran		tinar
SFX V		 ar		 aran		tivar
SFX V		 ar		 aran		tizar
SFX V		 ar		 arán		tizar
SFX V		 ar		 aran		tiznar
SFX V		 ar		 aran		tografiar
SFX V		 ar		 arán		tojar
SFX V		 ar		 arán		toñar
SFX V		 ar		 ara		ntonear
SFX V		 ar		 aran		tonear
SFX V		 ar		 arán		torar
SFX V		 ar		 aran		torear
SFX V		 ar		 arán		torizar
SFX V		 ar		 aran		trampar
SFX V		 ar		 arán		tranquilizar
SFX V		 ar		 ara		ntrar
SFX V		 ar		 aran		trar
SFX V		 ar		 arán		trar
SFX V		 ar		 aran		tratar
SFX V		 ar		 aran		trenar
SFX V		 ar		 arán		triar
SFX V		 ar		 aran		trificar
SFX V		 ar		 aran		trizar
SFX V		 ar		 arán		trizar
SFX V		 ar		 aran		tronar
SFX V		 ar		 aran		trucar
SFX V		 ar		 arán		tualizar
SFX V		 ar		 aran		tuar
SFX V		 ar		 aran		tular
SFX V		 ar		 aran		turar
SFX V		 ar		 arán		turar
SFX V		 ar		 aran		turbar
SFX V		 ar		 aran		tusar
SFX V		 ar		 arán		tusar
SFX V		 ar		 ara		nuar
SFX V		 ar		 aran		uar
SFX V		 ar		 arán		uar
SFX V		 ar		 aran		ucar
SFX V		 ar		 arán		ucar
SFX V		 ar		 aran		uchar
SFX V		 ar		 aran		uchear
SFX V		 ar		 aran		udar
