hunspell/spanish.dic
abanderar/V
abatanar/V
ablandecer/V
abollar/V
abrebotllar/V
absorbiar/V
abuñoler/V
acallantar/V
acaracolar/V
accidentar/V
acetabular/V
achuchar/V
acochiñar/V
acolitar/V
acorchar/V
acoyundar/V
actiñir/V
acuitar/V
adentrariar/V
admonicionar/V
adosar/V
adverar/V
afeminar/V
afrenillar/V
agermanar/V
agrar/V
aguachentar/V
aguicer/V
ahincar/V
ahusar/V
ajuar/V
alardear/V
alcanforadar/V
alegir/V
alfilar/V
alhajar/V
alinder/V
almagradar/V
almogavarear/V
altilocuenciar/V
amadrigar/V
amarillear/V
ameler/V
amlgar/V
amonedar/V
amoviar/V
amurrar/V
anclar/V
angrelar/V
anortopiar/V
antepenúltimar/V
antiguallar/V
anudar/V
apalabrar/V
apartar/V
apenar/V
apilguar/V
aplaudir/V
apopar/V
apoyar/V
apr/V
aquilatar/V
archir/V
argüir/V
arpiar/V
arrebugir/V
arrezaar/V
arrodreguir/V
asar/V
asistir/V
atabalear/V
atarrajar/V
atizonar/V
atrar/V
aturullar/V
autótrofar/V
ayudar/V
babir/V
baldonar/V
barbar/V
bastantear/V
befar/V
bichar/V
birler/V
bobinar/V
borbotar/V
brebajar/V
bruzar/V
cabar/V
cadmir/V
calibrar/V
campanillear/V
canturriar/V
carbasonar/V
carpintear/V
catacumbir/V
cazar/V
cenar/V
cernir/V
chamar/V
chasser/V
chismear/V
ciclar/V
circuncer/V
clasificar/V
cobardar/V
cohesionar/V
colorir/V
comparar/V
comprendar/V
concomar/V
confirmar/V
conmocionar/V
consumidar/V
contradichar/V
contrar/V
convnzar/V
corlar/V
cortar/V
cresponer/V
crucificar/V
cuboideonavicular/V
cumplar/V
dar/V
declarar/V
degradar/V
dentellar/V
derrengastar/V
desacordar/V
desalbarder/V
desaparejar/V
desasentar/V
desbarajustar/V
descalabrir/V
descepar/V
descompasar/V
descortecer/V
descuerdar/V
desempacar/V
desenclavarar/V
desenjaezar/V
desenzarcer/V
desgalibar/V
deshollinar/V
desler/V
desmazalar/V
desnevar/V
despatarrar/V
despertar/V
despreciar/V
destapiar/V
destronar/V
desviejar/V
deudorar/V
dicar/V
dilatar/V
discurrer/V
dispensar/V
doctorar/V
dragonear/V
edulcorar/V
emancipar/V
embaular/V
emboñír/V
emir/V
empecer/V
emplumar/V
enalmagrar/V
encamiñar/V
encasquillar/V
encimar/V
encorchetar/V
encurtar/V
enfermar/V
engarabatar/V
engriner/V
enjugar/V
enmascarar/V
enriquecer/V
ensangrentir/V
entablir/V
entramar/V
entretener/V
entup/V
envr/V
erosionar/V
escansionar/V
escolar/V
esculpír/V
espaldear/V
espolear/V
estandardizar/V
estofar/V
estudiar/V
exacrbar/V
exornar/V
expusar/V
extranjer/V
fallir/V
faunar/V
fiducir/V
flabelicornir/V
fomentar/V
fotopilar/V
friccionar/V
fumír/V
galopantar/V
garrar/V
geofracturar/V
glosofiter/V
grabasar/V
gringoler/V
guardacadenar/V
gutaperchar/V
haraquirir/V
heredar/V
hidroxiacer/V
holgar/V
horripilar/V
hupar/V
imantar/V
impostar/V
inciender/V
indaminar/V
influir/V
ininterrumper/V
insacular/V
insuflar/V
interviar/V
intuyereír/V
ir/V
jaldar/V
jorobar/V
kilopondar/V
lambar/V
larizar/V
leer/V
lgar/V
limpír/V
llampugar/V
últimar/V
machihembrar/V
malabar/V
malnacer/V
manear/V
manutuvr/V
mascujar/V
mechar/V
mentir/V
metonimir/V
mimbrear/V
mochar/V
monear/V
mordisquear/V
mr/V
murir/V
narizotar/V
nidar/V
nordestar/V
obar/V
ocasionar/V
oliverar/V
ordeñar/V
otorgar/V
palancar/V
paniculitir/V
parasitar/V
parvar/V
patrocinar/V
pegasear/V
peraledar/V
perlongar/V
pescozar/V
pidar/V
piratear/V
placer/V
plomar/V
policondensar/V
porciúncular/V
postremar/V
precavr/V
prefer/V
preponder/V
principar/V
profsar/V
propietar/V
pseudofitar/V
puntisecar/V
quer/V
rabear/V
raptar/V
reabsorbar/V
rebarbar/V
recamar/V
reclutir/V
reconstituyereír/V
recr/V
redundar/V
reforzar/V
registrar/V
reingr/V
relucir/V
remolinear/V
reordenar/V
repollar/V
resalgar/V
resoplar/V
reteñir/V
retrovendar/V
revirter/V
rilar/V
robustcer/V
roulottar/V
sabalar/V
salamanqsar/V
salvaguadar/V
sardinerar/V
secuenciar/V
seminternar/V
sernar/V
siegar/V
sinvergonzoner/V
sobrecomir/V
socarroñar/V
soliloquir/V
sosgar/V
subálgebrar/V
subvar/V
sumidar/V
suscribar/V
tacanar/V
tapidar/V
tatuar/V
temper/V
tertuliar/V
tioeter/V
tordillar/V
tragantar/V
translimitir/V
trasconejar/V
trasplantar/V
trefilar/V
trincar/V
trozar/V
turbar/V
ultramar/V
urear/V
valentonar/V
velar/V
verguir/V
videocassettar/V
vitalizar/V
vuelvepedrar/V
zafar/V
zedar/V
